test/src/morphology/V-muqdzhw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - mu’džõ: # Verb 30 'eng /est sasida/fin' - full paradigm
     mu’džõ+V+Inf: mu’džõ
     mu’džõ+V+Ger: mu’džõs
     mu’džõ+V+Sup: mu’džõm
     mu’džõ+V+Sup+Ine: mu’džõmõs
     mu’džõ+V+Sup+Ela: mu’džõmõst
     mu’džõ+V+Sup+Tra: mu’džõmõks
     mu’džõ+V+Sup+Abe: mu’džõmõt
     mu’džõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: mudžūb
     mu’džõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mu’džõt
     mu’džõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mudžūbõd
     mu’džõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mudžīz
     mu’džõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [mudžīzt, mudžīztõ]
     mu’džõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [mudžīzt, mudžīztõ]
     mu’džõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: mu’dž
     mu’džõ+V+Cond+Sg3: mu’džõks
     mu’džõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: mu’dž
     mu’džõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: mu’dž
     mu’džõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: mu’džõgid
     mu’džõ+V+Jus+Sg3: mu’džõg
     mu’džõ+V+Quo+Sg3: mu’džiji
     mu’džõ+V+ActPrfPrc: mu’džõn
     mu’džõ+V+PssPrfPrc: mu’dždõd
